apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="mebbe__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="whaur__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="but__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="an__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="efter__cnjadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tae__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bricht__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="braw__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="inglis__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="expensive__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lang/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="big/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ger</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gest</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bairnie/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="barr/y__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iest</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fat/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>test</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gled/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>der</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="h/eich__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>eich</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hier</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hiest</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sma/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'er</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'est</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/guid__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>guid</l>      <r>guid<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>better</l>    <r>guid<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>best</l>      <r>guid<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/bad__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>bad</l>       <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>warse</l>     <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>waur</l>      <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>warst</l>     <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/baud__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>baud</l>       <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>warse</l>     <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>waur</l>      <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>warst</l>     <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="h/ae__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>ae</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ae</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ev</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ev</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iv</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iv</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aes</l>       <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aed</l>       <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evin</l>      <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evin</l>      <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evin</l>      <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ha/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vin</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/be__vbser">
  <e>       <p><l>be</l>        <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wis</l>       <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wis</l>       <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wir</l>       <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>war</l>       <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>been</l>      <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bein</l>      <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bein</l>      <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bein</l>      <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="a/we__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>we</l>       <r>we<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>we</l>       <r>we<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wes</l>      <r>we<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>we<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>we<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>win</l>     <r>we<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>win</l>     <r>we<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>win</l>     <r>we<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="and">             <i>and</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="but">             <i>but</i><par n="but__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="but">             <i>but</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="nor">             <i>nor</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="or">              <i>or</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="whiniver">        <i>whiniver</i><par n="but__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="awmaist">         <i>awmaist</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="even">            <i>even</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hoo">             <i>hoo</i><par n="whaur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hooaniver">       <i>hooaniver</i><par n="whaur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="mair">            <i>mair</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="queem">           <i>queem</i><par n="mebbe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="whaur">           <i>whaur</i><par n="whaur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="wherr">           <i>wherr</i><par n="whaur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="efter">           <i>efter</i><par n="efter__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="as weel as">      <i>as<b/>weel<b/>as</i><par n="efter__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="tho">             <i>tho</i><par n="efter__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="whenever">        <i>whenever</i><par n="efter__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="at">              <i>at</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
<e lm="forenent">        <i>forenent</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ontil">           <i>ontil</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
<e lm="til">             <i>til</i><par n="tae__pr"/></e>
<e lm="bad">             <i></i><par n="/baud__adj"/></e>
<e lm="big">             <i>big</i><par n="big/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cannie">          <i>cannie</i><par n="bairnie/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="canny">           <i>cann</i><par n="barr/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cutty">           <i>cutt</i><par n="barr/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="derk">            <i>derk</i><par n="lang/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="endless">         <i>endless</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fat">             <i>fat</i><par n="fat/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gled">            <i>gled</i><par n="gled/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heeliegoleerie">  <i>heeliegoleerie</i><par n="bairnie/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heich">           <i>h</i><par n="h/eich__adj"/></e>
<e lm="het">             <i>het</i><par n="fat/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hungry">          <i>hungr</i><par n="barr/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="joco">            <i>joco</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lood">            <i>lood</i><par n="lang/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="peerie">          <i>peerie</i><par n="bairnie/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="reid">            <i>reid</i><par n="gled/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="resident">        <i>reesident</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="shair">           <i>shair</i><par n="lang/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sma">             <i>sma</i><par n="sma/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stupit">          <i>stupit</i><par n="fat/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="undauntit">       <i>undauntit</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="weel">            <i></i><par n="/guid__adj"/></e>
<e lm="weird">           <i>weird</i><par n="lang/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="Frainch">         <i>Frainch</i><par n="inglis__adj"/></e>
<e lm="French">          <i>French</i><par n="inglis__adj"/></e>
<e lm="Inglis">          <i>Inglis</i><par n="inglis__adj"/></e>
<e lm="guid">            <i></i><par n="/guid__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bad">             <i></i><par n="/bad__adj"/></e>
<e lm="braw">            <i>braw</i><par n="braw__adj"/></e>
<e lm="straucht">        <i>straucht</i><par n="braw__adj"/></e>
<e lm="scienteefic">     <i>scienteefic</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
<e lm="offeecial">       <i>offeecial</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
<e lm="caipital">        <i>caipital</i><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
<e lm="Welsh">           <p><l>Welsh</l>     <r>welsh</r></p><par n="bricht__adj"/></e>
<e lm="be">              <i></i><par n="/be__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="hae">             <i>h</i><par n="h/ae__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="awe">               <i>a</i><par n="a/we__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hae">               <i>ha</i><par n="ha/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hae">               <i>ha</i><par n="h/ae__vbmod"/></e>
